Wisconsin, session 2025, AB16.
do enact as follows:AB16,13Section 1. NR 20.05 (2) of the administrative code is repealed.AB16,24Section 2. Effective date.AB16,2,11(1) This act takes effect as provided in s. 227.265.AB16,2,22(end) Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab16 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab16 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB16 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB16 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB16: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting